src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-wadyosj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - вадё(сь): # Verb 'to grow' /Type 10/ - partial paradigm

     вадёсь+V+IV+ConNeg: вадюˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: вадёдˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: вадёданиʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: вадёдадиʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: вадёдаӈахаʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: вадёдаваˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: вадёдадаˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: вадёдаˮ 
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: вадёдадмʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: вадёдан
     вадёсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: вадёда
     вадёсь+V+IV+GerFin: вадёванзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ger: [вадё, вадёсь]
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: вадыниʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: вадыдиʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: вадыхыʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: вадываˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: вадыдаˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: вадыˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: вадыдмʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: вадын
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: вады
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: вадынинзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: вадыдинзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: вадыхынзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: вадываць
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: вадыдаць
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: вадыць
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: вадыдамзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: вадынась
     вадёсь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: вадысь
     вадёсь+V+IV+InfImprf: вадёва
     вадёсь+V+IV+InfPrf: вадёˮма
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: вадёвэниʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: вадёвэдиʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: вадёвэхэʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: вадёвэваˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: вадёвэдаˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: вадёвыˮ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: вадёвэдмʼ
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: вадёвэн
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: вадёвы
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: вадёвэнинзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: вадёвэдинзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: вадёвэхэнзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: вадёвэваць
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: вадёвэдаць
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [вадёвыць, вадёвэць]
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: вадёвэдамзь
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: вадёвэнась
     вадёсь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [вадёвысь, вадёвэсь]
     вадёсь+V+IV+PrcFut: [вадёванда, вадёвнда]
     вадёсь+V+IV+PrcImprf: вадёда
     вадёсь+V+IV+PrcNeg: вадёвдавэй
     вадёсь+V+IV+PrcPrf: вадёвы
